src/pron-yrk-morph.txt
LEXICON PronRoot
хибя+Pron+Interr+Hum:хибя VNOUN "who" ;
ӈамгэ+Pron+Interr:ӈамгэ VNOUN "what" ;
сян+Adn+Interr+Temp:сян VNOUN "how many" ;
сяхаʼ+Pron+Interr+Temp:сяхаʼ VNOUN "when" ;
ханзерʼ+Pron+Interr+Manner:харзерʼ VNOUN "how" ;
хурка+Adn+Interr:хурка VNOUN "what kind of" ;

сиˮми+Pron+Pers+1Sg+Acc:сиˮми PRON "me" ;
сит+Pron+Pers+2Sg+Acc:сит PRON "you (sg.)" ;
сита+Pron+Pers+3Sg+Acc:сита PRON "him, her, it" ;
сидниʼ+Pron+Pers+1Du+Acc:сидниʼ PRON "us (du.)" ;
сиддиʼ+Pron+Pers+2Du+Acc:сиддиʼ PRON "you (du.)" ;
сиддиʼ+Pron+Pers+3Du+Acc:сиддиʼ PRON "them (du.)" ;
сиднаˮ+Pron+Pers+1Pl+Acc:сиднаˮ PRON "us (pl.)" ;
сиддаˮ+Pron+Pers+2Pl+Acc:сиддаˮ PRON "you (pl.)" ;
сиддоʼ+Pron+Pers+3Pl+Acc:сиддоʼ PRON "them (pl.)" ;

ханяна+Pron+Interr+Spat+Loc:ханяна PRON "where" ;
тюкона+Pron+Dem+Spat+Loc:тюкона PRON "here" ;
таняна+Pron+Dem+Spat+Loc:таняна PRON "there" ;

ханяʼ+Pron+Interr+Spat+Lat:ханяʼ PRON "where (to), whither" ;

ханяд+Pron+Interr+Spat+Abl:ханяд PRON "where (from), whence" ;


тюку+Dem+Adn:тюку DEM "this" ;
тикы+Dem+Adn:тикы DEM "that" ;

мань+Pron+Pers+P1+Sg:мань PERS "I (1Sg.)" ;
пыдар+Pron+Pers+P2+Sg:пыдар PERS "you (2Sg.)" ;
пыда+Pron+Pers+P3+Sg:пыда PERS "he, she, it (3Sg.)" ;

маняʼ+Pron+Pers+P1+Pl:маняʼ PERS "we (1Pl.)" ;
пыдараʼ+Pron+Pers+P2+Pl:пыдараʼ PERS "you (2Pl.)" ;
пыдоʼ+Pron+Pers+P3+Pl:пыдоʼ PERS "they (3Pl.)" ;

маниʼ+Pron+Pers+P1+Du:маниʼ PERS "we (1Du.)" ;
пыдариʼ+Pron+Pers+P2+Du:пыдариʼ PERS "you (2Du.)" ;
пыдиʼ+Pron+Pers+P3+Du:пыдиʼ PERS "they (3Du.)" ;
